California statutes. Streets and Highways Code
“You are hereby notified that Bond ____, Series ____, 
representing a lien against Parcel Number ____ (or the legal 
description of the property in said bond) located at ____, for 
an improvement in the City (or County) of____, is 
delinquent. Unless
 the amount of the unpaid principal on the 
bond, together with interest, penalties, and recordation fee for 
filing notice of pendancy, is paid to the city (or county) treasurer 
on or before six months after the mailing of this notice, the date 
of which being this ____ day of____, 19__, or unless 
the bond is reinstated as provided by Section 6631, the 
undersigned will proceed to advertise and sell the lot or parcel 
of land in the manner prescribed by law to satisfy the amount of 
the bond, interest, penalties, and costs.”

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1443, Sec. 2.   Effective September 27, 1982.   Operative January 1, 1983, by Sec. 8 of Ch. 1443.)
-------------------------------------------

6501.1.

(a) If there is surplus money remaining from the sale after payment of the amount due on the bond, plus interest, penalties, and costs of sale, the treasurer shall hold the surplus money in trust during the period of redemption or until the amount due is paid by a redemptioner. In the event of redemption, the treasurer shall pay to the holder of the certificate of sale the amount of principal, interest, and penalties due on the bond, costs paid by the holder, and any surplus money held in trust. In the event that there is no redemption of the bond during the redemption period, the treasurer shall pay the surplus money in the following order:

(1) To the lienholders of record prior to the issuance of the treasurer’s deed, in the order of their priority;

(2) To the person who was the owner of record prior to the issuance of the treasurer’s deed, if he can be found within a three-year period following such sale, or, if such person cannot be found in such period, to each taxing agency in the same proportion that each agency’s taxes bear to the total taxes.

(b)(1) Written notice of the right to claim surplus money shall be sent to the last known address of any person who had a recorded interest in the property at the time of sale. Such notice shall be sent no later than 90 days after the sale of the property.

(2) If the last known address of a person with a recorded interest in the property is not
 known, notice shall be published once a week for three successive weeks in a newspaper of general circulation in the county. Such notice shall commence no later than 60 days after the sale of such property.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 615.)
-------------------------------------------

6502.

No sale of property shall be made pursuant to this chapter unless the notices are sent pursuant to Sections 6500, 6501, 6505, and 6505.2. The failure of the property owner to receive or accept the notices does not affect the validity of the sale or invalidate any subsequent act or proceeding.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 475, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

6503.

After the expiration of six months from the time of mailing the notice and upon payment by the holder of the bond to the treasurer of the amounts specified in Section 6505.1, the treasurer shall publish a notice of sale in a newspaper of general circulation, published in the city in which the bond was issued, or if no newspaper is published in the city, then in some newspaper having general circulation therein.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 17.)
-------------------------------------------

6504.

The notice of sale shall be in substantially (filling in all blanks) the following form:

“Notice of Sale of Property Delinquent for Nonpayment of Bond No.__, Series No.__, Issued for the Improvement of ____

“Default having been made in the payment of the following named coupons (here fill in date and amounts of the coupon or coupons which have not been paid) and the holder of said bond having demanded in writing that the Treasurer of the City (or County) of ____ proceed to advertise and sell the lot or parcel of land mentioned in said bond. Now, therefore, I give notice that I will
 on the ____ day of ____, 20__, at the hour of ____ o’clock _m., of said day, sell at public auction the lot or parcel of land mentioned in said bond, to wit: Parcel Number ____ (or the legal description of the property in said bond) located at ____, at (here state the place of sale, which shall be at the office of said treasurer or at some public place in said city (or county)) unless the amount due on said bond and the accrued interest thereon together with the costs set forth in the third paragraph of this notice are paid; and that I will so sell the same to the person who will pay the highest price for the entire lot or parcel of land hereinafter described, but not less than the full amount of unpaid principal, interest, and penalties on said bond, together with all costs. In the event there is no bidder for the total amount due on said bond, together with the accrued interest, penalties, and costs of sale, I
 shall deem said lot or parcel of land sold to the holder of said bond, as provided in Section 6509 of the Streets and Highways Code. The lot or parcel of land mentioned in said bond and to be sold, is more particularly described, to wit: (here set forth the description of the lot or parcel of land as contained in the bond). The amount due on said bond up to the date of this notice is as follows: Due on the principal thereof, ____ dollars ($____); due on account of interest ____ dollars ($____) (here set forth the interest calculated and compounded semiannually up to the date on which the notice is dated at the interest rate named in said bond upon the unpaid principal for the full period for which no interest has been paid) due on account of penalties ____ dollars ($____). Total amount due on said bond (here set forth the total of the foregoing items).

“In
 order to avoid this sale, payment of the total amount above named will be required together with the additional interest accruing up to the date of payment and the following costs: (a) the cost of recording pendency of foreclosure as provided in Section 3121 of the Streets and Highways Code; (b) if incurred, costs of obtaining an abstract of title or title search; (c) the cost of publication of the notice of sale incurred before such payment; and (d) the sum of three dollars ($3) for ascertainment by the treasurer of the name and address of the property owner, as shown on the last equalized roll for taxes, and any person whose name appears as owner on the records of the county assessor’s office which the county will use to prepare the next assessor’s roll. The bond may be reinstated and the sale avoided upon payment of the amounts due, interest, penalties, and costs in the manner provided in
 Sections 3121 and 6631 of the Streets and Highways Code.

“In the event of sale, such sale will include interest in addition to the above total amount due accruing up to the date of sale, the costs provided in Section 6505.1 of the Streets and Highways Code, and the fee for recording the certificate of sale. The ____ (here name newspaper) is designated as the newspaper in which this notice shall be published.Dated _______Treasurer of the City (or County)of ____________”

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 198, Sec. 13.   (AB 3246)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

6505.

(a) The day specified in the notice of sale shall not be less than 45 days from the date of the first publication of the notice.

(b) At least 30 days prior to the sale, a copy of the notice of sale shall be transmitted by the treasurer by certified mail to the bondholder at his last known address.

(c) At least 30 days prior to the sale, the treasurer shall mail, by first-class mail, a copy of the notice of sale and the following notice which shall be printed in at least 14-point boldface type to the property owner as shown on the
 last equalized roll for taxes and to any other person whose name appears as owner on the records of the county assessor’s office which the county will use to prepare the next assessor’s roll. 
IMPORTANT NOTICE
Because you have not paid the money you owe to the city (or county) treasurer for ____ improvements made in your area, the treasurer has arranged to sell your property. You must pay off this debt by (day before sale) or your property will be sold.

If you wish to stop this sale and save your property, call the foreclosure clerk at the treasurer’s office, telephone number ____, to arrange for payment of this debt. See the attached notice for further details regarding this sale.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 483.)
-------------------------------------------

6505.1.

The treasurer shall be under no obligation to publish or mail notice of sale as provided in Sections 6503, 6504, 6505, and 6505.2 unless the bondholder deposits with the treasurer, prior to the issuance of the notice, the following sums and documents:

(a) A receipt from the county recorder for the cost of recording notice of pendency of foreclosure as provided by Section 3121.

(b) A fee to reimburse the city or county for its estimated reasonable cost of obtaining the name and last known mailing address of, and for mailing
 notices required by Section 6505.2 to, parties of interest as defined by Section 6505.4. 

(c) The sum of three dollars ($3) for ascertainment by the treasurer of the name and address of the property owner, as shown on the last equalized assessment roll for taxes, and any person whose name appears as owner on the records of the county assessor’s office which will be used by the county to prepare the next assessor’s roll.

(d) Cost of publication of the notice of sale.

(e) Treasurer’s fee for issuance of certificate of sale which is hereby fixed at seven dollars ($7).

(f) Sheriff’s travel fees, as provided in Section 26746 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 475, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

6505.2.

(a) Not less than 45 days nor more than 60 days prior to the date of sale, the treasurer shall send notice by registered mail to the last known mailing address, if available, of parties of interest, as defined in Section 6505.4. The content of the notice shall include the date, time, and place of the proposed sale, the amount required to redeem prior to the time of sale, and information regarding the rights of persons to claim surplus money, as defined in Section 6501.1, if the property is sold and surplus money results from the sale. 

(b) The treasurer shall make a
 reasonable effort to obtain the name and last known mailing address of parties of interest.

(c) The validity of any sale under this chapter is not affected if the treasurer’s reasonable effort fails to disclose the name and last known mailing address of parties of interest or if a party of interest does not receive the mailed notice.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 475, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

6505.4.

For the purpose of giving notice, as required by Section 6505.2, parties of interest are all of the following:

(a) Lienholders of record prior to the issuance of the treasurer’s deed.

(b) Any other person who would be vested with title to all, or any portion, of the property to be sold by redemption of the property.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 475, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

6506.

Any affidavit of publication setting forth a copy of the publication and stating that the publication was made in the newspaper named on specified dates shall be filed with the treasurer and shall be prima facie evidence of the publication of the notice.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 17.)
-------------------------------------------

6507.

The treasurer shall collect the sum of seven dollars ($7) for the issuance of the certificate of sale, which sum shall belong to and be subject to the disposition of the city or county.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 64.)
-------------------------------------------

6508.

If at any time prior to the sale any person interested in the lot or parcel of land described in the notice of sale pays the whole amount of the unpaid principal of the bond, the interest thereon compounded semiannually up to the date of such payment, at the rate named in the bond upon the amount of the principal remaining unpaid for the whole period for which interest has not been paid, and all penalties which have accrued, together with the sums specified in Section 6505.1, except for the fee for the issuance of the certificate of sale, the bond shall be canceled. If redemption of the bond is made by the property owner prior to publication of notice of sale, but after the
 treasurer has incurred any expense for such publication, the property owner shall pay to the treasurer such expense incurred by the treasurer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 17.)
-------------------------------------------

6508.2.

Prior to the sale of any owner-occupied residential property, the treasurer or his or her designee shall, in person, make every reasonable effort to meet with the owner-occupant in the office of the treasurer or his or her designee or otherwise speak with the owner-occupant. During this contact, the treasurer or his or her designee shall, in language understandable to the owner-occupant, explain that the property will be sold unless the delinquency is paid. The explanation shall also include a full explanation of the right of redemption.

Failure to comply with this section shall not
 invalidate any sale pursuant to this act.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1443, Sec. 4.   Effective September 27, 1982.   Operative January 1, 1983, by Sec. 8 of Ch. 1443.)
-------------------------------------------

6509.

(a) If such payment is not made, the sale shall be made as advertised, and the lot or parcel described in the bond shall be sold to the purchaser who will pay the highest price for the entire lot or parcel of land to be sold, but not less than the higher of (1) the amount due on the bond, together with accrued interest, penalties, and all of the sums specified in the notice of sale that are due in the event of sale, or (2) an amount equal to not less than 50 percent of the fair market value of the property.

(b) In the event there are no bidders, the bondholder shall be liable for the minimum
 sales price. Payment to the treasurer at the time of sale need not exceed the amount specified in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a), and the balance, if any, shall be payable at the time the deed is issued.

(c) In the event there are no bidders, a certificate of sale for the entire lot or parcel of land described in the bond shall be issued to the bondholder after surrender of the bond, including all unpaid principal and interest coupons, to the treasurer and after payment to the treasurer of the fee of the recorder for recording such certificate, and, if incurred, and if no deposit was made pursuant to Section 6500, the cost of an abstract of title or title search of the real property sold under foreclosure; and also at that time the costs of the sale and other fees previously paid to the treasurer pursuant to Section 6505.1.

(d) For the purpose of this section, “fair market
 value” means the amount, as defined in Section 110 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, as determined pursuant to an appraisal of such property by the county assessor within one year immediately preceding the date of the sale, inclusive of the cost of appraisal, notice, recording, and the cost of an abstract of title or title search of such real property, if any. The fair market value as determined by the assessor pursuant to appraisal shall be conclusively presumed in favor of any purchaser or encumbrancer for value of such property.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 615.)
-------------------------------------------

6510.

If through error or otherwise the total amount for which the sale is made is less than that required by the provisions of this chapter, and the holder of the bond either is the purchaser at the sale and elects to accept the certificate of sale hereinafter mentioned, or accepts from the treasurer the sum derived from the sale made to some other purchaser, the fact that the sale was made for less than the amounts specified in this chapter shall not affect or invalidate the sale, and the acceptance of the certificate or of the sum derived from the sale shall be a waiver on the part of the holder of the bond, and in such case the amount received on the sale shall be the amount upon
 which redemption from the sale shall be calculated the same as if the sale had been made for the full amount authorized by this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

6511.

The treasurer, before delivering any certificate of sale, shall enter the following data in a book kept in his office for that purpose:

(a) The date, number, and series of the bond.

(b) A description of the land sold corresponding with the description of the certificate of sale.

(c) The date of sale, the purchaser’s name, and the amount paid.

He shall regularly number the descriptions on the margin of the book, and put a corresponding number on
 each certificate. He shall enter on the record of the bond the words: “Canceled by sale of the property,” giving the date of such sale.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

6512.

Such book shall be open to public inspection during office hours when not in actual use.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

6513.

The treasurer shall issue for each sale an original and a duplicate certificate of sale containing:

(a) The date, number and series of the bond under which the sale was made,

(b) A description of the land sold, and

(c) The date of the sale, the purchaser’s name, a statement that the property was sold in accordance with the provisions of Section 6509, and the number of the certificate.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 615.)
-------------------------------------------

6514.

The treasurer shall deliver the original certificate of sale to the purchaser and shall record the duplicate in the office of the recorder of the county in which the land sold is situated.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

6515.

At any time after its delivery to him the legal holder of the certificate of sale may pay any general taxes, street improvement assessments, or any other tax or statutory lien upon the property described in the certificate of sale which may be prior to his lien or he may redeem the property from any sale made in the collection or enforcement of such general taxes, or foreclosing street improvement assessments or other tax or statutory liens.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

6516.

Upon production by the holder of the certificate of sale of the official receipt for the amounts so paid by him, the treasurer shall make an indorsement upon the certificate of sale showing that receipts have been so produced and stating the nature of the tax or lien paid, and the amount thereof. He shall also make a like entry in the book containing the bond record and shall collect the amount so entered as a part of the amount represented by the certificate of sale together with interest thereon at the same rate as provided on the purchase money for redemption.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

6517.

Immediately on the sale, the purchaser shall become vested with a lien on the property sold to him, to the extent of his bid. He may only be divested of that lien by redemption.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

6518.

The holder of a certificate of sale, upon assignment of such certificate shall immediately notify the treasurer thereof, giving the name and address of the assignee and shall endorse such assignment on the certificate of sale.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 653.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 7. Redemption of Delinquent Property [6530. - 6532.]

6530.

A redemption of the property sold may be made by the owner or any party in interest within 12 months from the date of purchase, or at any time prior to the application by the purchaser for a deed. Redemption shall be made in lawful money of the United States.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

6530.5.

The treasurer, within 10 days of the issuance of the certificate of sale, shall mail a notice to the owner of the property sold pursuant to this chapter. The notice shall be sent by first-class mail to the owner of the property as shown on the last equalized assessment roll and to any person whose name appears as an owner on the records of the county assessor’s office which the county assessor will use to prepare the next assessor’s roll. The notice shall state the following in at least 14-point boldface type:
IMPORTANT NOTICE

Your property located at ____ has been sold by the city (or county) treasurer because you did not pay for ____ improvements made in your area. You still have at least 11 months to pay $ (amount) which you owe plus penalties, interests, and costs. YOU CAN STILL SAVE YOUR PROPERTY. Contact the foreclosure clerk at the treasurer’s office to find out the exact amount due. The telephone number is ____. If you do not pay this debt, you will lose your property and all the money you have invested in it. Act now!

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 483.)
-------------------------------------------

6531.

Redemption can be made only by the payment to the treasurer of the following, together with interest at the rate of 1 percent a month from the date of sale:

(a) The amount due on the bond and costs.

(b) The moneys paid for taxes, street improvement assessments, or other taxes or statutory liens or to redeem the property from any sale in the collection or enforcement of any of the liens.

(c) The fee of the recorder for recording the certificate of sale and for filing the notice of pendency of sale or foreclosure pursuant to Part 3 (commencing with Section 3120) of Division 4.5.

(d) If incurred, the cost of an abstract of title or title search of the real property sold under foreclosure.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 483.)
-------------------------------------------

6532.

When the redemption is made to the treasurer he shall mark the word: “Redeemed,” the date and by whom redeemed on the margin of the book where the entry of the certificate of sale is made. He shall credit the amount paid to the purchaser named in the certificate, and pay the money to the purchaser, or his assignee, upon the surrender of the certificate of sale, and upon satisfactory proof of an assignment thereof, if the certificate has been assigned.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 8. Conveyance of Unredeemed Property [6550. - 6556.]

6550.

In order to obtain a deed, the purchaser of the property or his assignees shall, 60 days prior to the expiration of the time of redemption, or 60 days before the date of his application for a deed, request the treasurer to send a written notice by certified mail, postage prepaid, to the owner of the property purchased, stating his intention to apply for a deed to the property purchased. In addition, the treasurer shall have the notice described in this section served upon the property owner by a process server pursuant to Section 415.10 of the Code of Civil Procedure and verified pursuant to Section 2009 of that code. The term “owner”, as used in this section, is the name and address of the property owner as shown on the last equalized roll for taxes, and any person whose name appears as owner on the records of the county assessor’s office which the county will use to prepare the next assessor’s roll. However, if the owner of the property has not been personally served at the end of 60 days after posting the notice required by this section, and if reasonable diligence has been used to find and serve the owner, the notices mailed and posted pursuant to this section shall be deemed adequate service. In such a case, the notice requirements of this section shall be deemed complied with upon the execution of the treasurer of a certificate stating the nature of the efforts made to personally serve the owner and that the owner cannot, with reasonable diligence, be so served. At the time of making such request, the purchaser or his assignee shall pay to the teasurer the following sums:

(i) For issuance of the notice and mailing the same by certified mail and for cost of preparation of the affidavit required by Section 6552, the sum of three dollars ($3).

(ii) For search of the last equalized assessment roll to determine the name and address of the owner, as defined, the sum of three dollars ($3).

(iii) For service of the notice and verification thereof.

(iv) For posting the notice as required by this section, the fees provided by Sections 26725 and 26746 of the Government Code. The notice shall include all of subdivisions (a) to (f), inclusive, with subdivision (a) printed in at least 14-point boldface type.
 
IMPORTANT FINAL NOTICE
(a) Your property located at (address) was sold by the city (or county) treasurer on (date of sale) because you did not pay for ____ improvements made in your area. You can still save your property, but you must pay what you owe by ____. Contact the foreclosure clerk at the treasurer’s office at telephone number ____ to arrange for payment of this debt. You will receive no further notices regarding this matter.

(b) That the property has been sold to satisfy the bond lien.

(c) The date of sale.

(d) The date, number, and series of the bond.

(e) The amount then due.

(f) The time when the right of redemption will expire, or when the purchaser will apply for a deed. 

The treasurer shall immediately, upon such request being made and payment of the required fees, send a copy of the notice addressed to the owner of the property purchased as shown on the last equalized roll for taxes, and any person whose name appears as owner on the records of the county assessor’s office which the county will use to prepare the next assessor’s roll. Such notice shall be mailed at least 60 days before the expiration of the time for redemption, or 60 days before the purchaser applies for a deed. The treasurer also shall post a copy of such notice in a conspicuous place upon the property, if a survey is not required to identify and locate the property. Any travel fees incurred in attempting to post such notice shall be charged in the same amount as is provided for an actual posting in Section 26746 of the Government Code. Such notice shall be posted at least 60 days before the expiration of the time for redemption.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 483.)
-------------------------------------------

6551.

The owner of the property shall have the right of redemption until such notice is given and the deed applied for, upon the payment of the fees, penalties and costs as required, or if no deed is applied for, until four years after the date of the issuance of the certificate of sale at which time the certificate of sale would be conclusively presumed to be redeemed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 17.)
-------------------------------------------

6552.

No deed to the property sold shall be issued by the treasurer to the purchaser until the treasurer has filed for the record an affidavit showing that the required notices have been given. The affidavit shall be filed and preserved by the treasurer with other records kept by him in his office.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 17.)
-------------------------------------------

6554.

If the property is not redeemed within the time allowed the treasurer shall upon application of the purchaser or his assignee make a deed to the property, reciting in the deed substantially the matter contained in the certificate of sale, and that no person has redeemed the property during the time allowed for its redemption. The treasurer shall be entitled to receive seven dollars ($7) from the purchaser for making the deed. All money so received by the treasurer shall be deposited in the treasury for the use of the city after payment has been made therefrom for the acknowledgement of the deed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1971, Ch. 797.)
-------------------------------------------

6555.

The deed of the treasurer, when duly acknowledged or proved, is primary evidence of the regularity of all proceedings theretofore had, and conveys to the grantee the absolute title to the lands described therein, as of the date of the expiration of the period for redemption, free of all encumbrances, except:

(a) The lien for general taxes or ad valorem assessments in the nature of and collected as taxes levied by the state or county, city, special district or other local agency.

(b) The lien of any special assessment or assessments the lien date of which is prior in time to the lien date of the assessment for which the deed is issued. 

(c) Easements constituting servitudes upon or burdens to said lands.

(d) Water rights, the record title to which is held separately from the title to said lands.

(e) Restrictions of record.

If the treasurer of another city, as city is defined by Section 5005, has issued subordinate bonds, as defined by Section 5373, against the same property upon which the treasurer’s deed was issued, then the treasurer of the other city shall cancel the subordinate bonds and enter upon the bond register the notation “canceled by foreclosure of prior lien,” provided that he is notified of the issuance of the deed by the owner of the deed.

If the superintendent of streets of another city, as city is defined in Section 5005, has issued subordinate assessments, as defined by Section 5373, against the same property upon which such treasurer’s deed was issued, then the superintendent of streets shall cancel the subordinate assessments and enter upon the assessment roll the notation “canceled by foreclosure of prior lien,” provided that he is notified of the issuance of the deed by the owner of the deed.

If the treasurer has issued subordinate bonds, as defined by Section 5373, against the same property upon which the treasurer’s deed is issued, then the treasurer shall cancel the subordinate bonds, and enter upon the bond register the notation “canceled by foreclosure of prior lien.” If the superintendent of streets has issued subordinate assessments, as defined by Section 5373, against the same property upon which such treasurer’s deed is issued, then the superintendent of streets shall cancel the subordinate assessments and enter upon the assessment roll the notation “canceled by foreclosure of prior lien,” provided that he is notified of the issuance of the treasurer’s deed by either the treasurer or the owner of the deed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1968, Ch. 679.)
-------------------------------------------

6556.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, if the purchaser of owner-occupied residential property at a sale under Section 6509, or an assignee or transferee of the purchaser, has not applied for the deed to the property and recorded the deed in the office of the county recorder in which the property lies, within 16 months of the date of issuance of the certificate of sale, the certificate of sale and the deed are void and neither the certificate of sale nor the deed shall have any legal effect.

This section shall apply to sales held after the effective date of this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1443, Sec. 5.   Effective September 27, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 9. Contesting Validity of Sales and Deeds for Delinquency [6570. - 6572.]

6570.

Within 60 days after the sale of the property for delinquency, the purchaser may send to the person to whom the property is assessed for purposes of taxation as shown upon the last equalized assessment roll of the county in which the property lies, and to the person in whose name, on the date the sale is made, the legal title to the property appears by deed duly recorded in the office of the county recorder of the county in which the property lies, by registered mail and first-class mail, postage prepaid, a copy of the certificate of sale. Together with the copy of the certificate of sale, a notice shall be sent that is printed in at least 14-point boldface type in the following form:
YOUR PROPERTY HAS BEEN SOLD

Your property located at ____ has been sold by the treasurer’s office of the city (or county) for nonpayment of ____ improvement assessment.

You have one year from the date this notice was mailed to contest the validity of the sale. 

If a copy of the certificate of sale is sent as provided in this section, no action, suit, or proceeding to set aside, cancel, or in any manner attack or question the validity of any sale for delinquency, or any proceedings prior thereto, shall be commenced or maintained by any person unless the same shall be commenced within one year after the date the above notice was mailed. After the year has expired, all persons shall be barred from commencing or prosecuting any such action, suit, or proceeding, and any and all persons shall be barred from asserting or maintaining in any action, suit, or proceeding that the sale, or any proceedings prior thereto, was invalid.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 483.)
-------------------------------------------

6571.

Any action, suit, or proceeding attacking or contesting the validity of any deed issued under the provisions of this division, or the validity of the proceedings subsequent to the issuance of the certificate of sale, shall be brought within 12 months after the issuance of the deed, and if the validity of the deed or of the proceedings is not contested within that 12 months’ period, it shall not be thereafter contested or questioned in any action, suit, or proceeding, except that an action, suit, or proceeding with respect to any deed of owner-occupied residential property may be brought within 12 months after discovery of the issuance of the deed or, for owner-occupied residential property sold between January 1, 1969, and January 1, 1979, within 12 months after the enactment of the amendments to this section made during the 1981–82 Regular Session of the Legislature.

A defense to a proceeding pursuant to this section shall be that the current owner of record is a bona fide purchaser for value.

The Legislature finds and declares that the court of appeal in Atkins v. Kessler, 97 Cal. App. 3d 784, held that under the former provisions of this division the statute of limitations in this section could not be raised against an owner in possession of residential real property during the entire period of delinquency and sale because due process was violated. It is therefore the intent of the Legislature that the amendments to this section made during the 1981–82 Regular Session of the Legislature shall be applied retrospectively with respect to any owners in possession of residential real property during the entire period of delinquency and at the time of the sale whose homes were sold pursuant to this act between January 1, 1969, and January 1, 1979.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1443, Sec. 6.   Effective September 27, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

6572.

If any sale of lands for delinquency in the payment of principal or interest of any bond is held illegal or invalid, or any deed issued to the purchaser at any such sale is held illegal or invalid for any reason whatsoever, the lands described in the bond shall not be released from the lien of the assessment but shall be and remain subject to further proceedings for the enforcement of the assessment, and the further proceedings may include additional sales or the issuance of new deeds. In any event, however, the lien of the assessment shall continue only until a valid sale is had and a valid deed issued, or until the expiration of two years after such sale or deed is held illegal or invalid, whichever is sooner.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1945, Ch. 354.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 11. Foreclosure of Bond Lien [6610. - 6623.]

6610.

As a separate, distinct and cumulative remedy, the holder of any bond upon which any payment either upon the principal or of the interest has become delinquent may, if the city which initiated the proceedings is not a county, at any time after three months after the date it is provided by ordinance or charter of the city that taxes are due, or if a county initiated the proceedings or collects the taxes for the city at any time after four months next succeeding the fourth Monday of September, following the date of delinquency of principal or interest and prior to the expiration of four years after the due date of the last installment upon any bond or of the last principal
 coupon attached thereto, file and maintain an action to foreclose the lien of the bond and recover the amount due thereon.

No action shall be commenced pursuant to this section until the expiration of 15 days after a notice containing the amount of the payment due, the date the payment is or was due, penalties which may accrue for failure to pay, and notice of the foreclosure action which may occur if payment is not made is mailed, postage prepaid and registered, by the bondholder, or his representative, to the owner of the property at his last known address as it appears on the tax rolls.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1969, Ch. 1221.)
-------------------------------------------

6611.

The action may be brought also at any time following the expiration of 30 days after the service of personal demand for payment upon the owner of the premises. Such demand shall be served in the manner provided by law for the service of a summons in a civil action. If the action is brought costs for the service of the demand shall be allowed in an amount equivalent to the fees prescribed by law for the service of summons.

The demand shall be in substantially the following form: 
“Demand for Payment of Street Improvement Bond
You are hereby notified that
 Bond No. ____ Series No. ____ for an improvement in the City (or County) of ____ is delinquent. Unless the amount of the unpaid principal on said bond together with interest and penalties is paid to the city (or county) treasurer on or before 30 days after the service on you of this demand, the date of such service being this ____ day of ____, 20__, the undersigned will institute suit to foreclose the lien of said bond in the manner prescribed by law.”

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 198, Sec. 14.   (AB 3246)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

6612.

The action shall be brought in the superior court of the county in which the proceedings were initiated and if the owner of the lot or parcel of land covered by the bond can not with due diligence be found, the service of summons in such action may be had in the manner prescribed by law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

6613.
